District of Columbia statutes.
7-1304.10

Appeal of commitment order.

Any commitment order of the Court may be appealed in a like manner as other civil actions.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-137, § 410, 25 DCR 5094
1981 Ed., § 6-1950.
1973 Ed., § 6-1677.